Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB686.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1305.1. Criminal penalty.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits an offense if the person intentionally and unlawfully alters, destroys, conceals, removes or otherwise impairs the verity or availability of any record for which a request has been made under this act.<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324 (b) Grading.--An offense under this section is a felony of the third degree.SECTION 1. SECTION 4911(B) OF TITLE 18 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 4911. TAMPERING WITH PUBLIC RECORDS OR INFORMATION.* * *(B) GRADING.--AN OFFENSE UNDER THIS SECTION IS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE SECOND DEGREE UNLESS THE RECORD, DOCUMENT OR THING IS THE SUBJECT OF A CURRENT REQUEST OR APPEAL UNDER THE ACT OF FEBRUARY 14, 2008 (P.L.6, NO.3), KNOWN AS THE RIGHT-TO-KNOW LAW, OR THE INTENT OF THE ACTOR IS TO DEFRAUD OR INJURE ANYONE, IN WHICH CASE THE OFFENSE IS A FELONY OF THE THIRD DEGREE.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0686PN0755 - 2 - <--12345678910111213